Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 3. Taxes

§ 511.
Budget.

At a meeting legally warned for that purpose, the electorate within an incorporated school district shall vote such sums of money as it deems necessary for the support of schools. If the sums are not approved or acted upon at the annual meeting, the electorate shall vote the questions at a duly warned special school district meeting. A district may vote money necessary for the support of schools to the end of the full school year next ensuing.

If the electorate of an incorporated school district votes for its budget by Australian ballot, it shall do so using ballot language jointly developed by the Secretary of Education and Secretary of State and adopted by the State Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 2, 1982;

1997, No. 60

, § 27, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 84, eff. March 11, 1998, § 72, eff. Jan. 1, 1999;

1999, No. 1

, § 60d, eff. March 31, 1999;

1999, No. 1

52

(Adj. Sess.), § 166b;

2003, No. 36

, § 4;

2003, No. 68

, § 2;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 56, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 512.
Payment of monies collected to treasurer.

On the written request of one or more members of the prudential committee, a school district tax collector shall pay to the treasurer monies belonging to the district that have been collected to the date of the request and submit his or her tax book and list to the treasurer for inspection and computation. A tax collector who neglects to do so within ten days after receiving the request shall forfeit to the school district $100.00, to be recovered in an action on this statute, and the office of tax collector shall be vacant.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 57, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 513.
Repealed. 2007, No. 66, § 15.

§ 514.
Abatement.

The officers of the district, except the tax collector, shall be a board for the abatement of district taxes, and it shall have the same power that the board for the abatement of town taxes has in the abatement of municipal taxes. On request of the tax collector, the prudential committee shall call a meeting of the board in the month of February in each year, by posting a notice in three public places in the district at least five days before the meeting.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 58, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 515.
Payment of a deficit.

When a demand is made upon a district for the payment of an execution issued against it and the district has no available funds to pay the same, the prudential committee shall borrow funds sufficient to pay such execution and related charges and shall add the debt to the following year’s adopted budget pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 1523(b)

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 108, eff. March 11, 1998.